Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Workers’ Compensation
Board ........................................ $ 34,007,588
(2) Workers’ Compensation
Division..................................... $ 79,319,071
(3) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 69,597,261
(4) Central Services Division .......... $ 69,697,629
(5) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $201,050,211
(6) Building Codes Division ............ $ 55,071,839
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the  Department of Consumer and
Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 10,428,558
(2) Central Services Division .......... $ 380,973
(3) Building Codes Division ............ $ 231,554
(4) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $120,075,414
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$1,808,965 for the Universal Health Plan Governance Board.
SECTION 4.
For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the following expenditures by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Workers’ Benefit Fund;
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 1
(2) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Adjustment Reserve;
(3) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Group Adjustment Reserve;
(4) Expenditures from the Consumer and Business Services Fund for  payment of con-
tracted collection costs, including contracted processing costs for the Combined Payroll  Tax
Reporting System and  workers’ compensation paying agent reimbursements as described in
ORS 656.307;
(5) Expenditures from the Funeral and Cemetery Consumer Protection Trust Fund; and
(6) Special payments to  Oregon Health and Science University for research on occupa-
tional illness and disease.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 2